Utah statutes.
59-10-1107.   Refundable economic development tax credit.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Business entity" means a claimant, estate, or trust that meets the
definition of "business entity" as defined in Section 63M-1-2403 or
63M-1-2803.
(b)  "Office" means the Governor's Office of Economic Development.
(2)  A business entity may claim a refundable tax credit for economic
development.
(3)  The tax credit under this section is the amount listed as the tax credit
amount on the tax credit certificate that the office issues to the business
entity for the taxable year.
(4) (a)  In accordance with any rules prescribed by the commission under
Subsection (4)(b), the commission shall make a refund to a business entity
that claims a tax credit under this section if the amount of the tax credit
exceeds the business entity's tax liability for a taxable year.
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules providing procedures for making a refund to
a business entity as required by Subsection (4)(a).
(5) (a)  On or before October 1, 2013, and every five years after October 1,
2013, the Utah Tax Review Commission shall study the tax credit allowed by
this section and make recommendations to the Revenue and Taxation Interim
Committee and the Workforce Services and Community and Economic Development
Interim Committee concerning whether the tax credit should be continued,
modified, or repealed.
(b)  For purposes of the study required by this Subsection (5), the office
shall provide the following information to the Utah Tax Review Commission:
(i)  the amount of tax credit the office grants to each taxpayer for each
calendar year;
(ii)  the criteria the office uses in granting a tax credit;
(iii)  the new state revenues generated by each taxpayer for each calendar
year;
(iv)  the information contained in the office's latest report to the
Legislature under Section 63M-1-2406 or 63M-1-2806; and
(v)  any other information that the Utah Tax Review Commission requests.
(c)  The Utah Tax Review Commission shall ensure that its recommendations
under Subsection (5)(a) include an evaluation of:
(i)  the cost of the tax credit to the state;
(ii)  the purpose and effectiveness of the tax credit; and
(iii)  the extent to which the state benefits from the tax credit.
